New York, session 2025-2026, S1364.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 1-0305 to read as follows: 3 § 1-0305. Powers of the attorney general. 4 Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the 5 attorney general, upon the attorney general's own initiative, is hereby 6 authorized to, in the name of the people of the state of New York, 7 enforce the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations 8 promulgated pursuant thereto by commencing a special proceeding in a 9 court having jurisdiction. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03099-01-5